Utah statutes.
26-18-5.   Contracts for provision of medical services -- Federal provisions modifying department rules -- Compliance with Social Security Act.

(1)  The department may contract with other public or private agencies to purchase or provide medical services in connection with the programs of the division.  Where these programs are used by other state agencies, contracts shall provide that other state agencies transfer the state matching funds to the department in amounts sufficient to satisfy needs of the specified program.

(2)  All contracts for the provision or purchase of medical services shall be established on the basis of the state's fiscal year and shall remain uniform during the fiscal year insofar as possible.  Contract terms shall include provisions for maintenance, administration, and service costs.

(3)  If a federal legislative or executive provision requires modifications or revisions in an eligibility factor established under this chapter as a condition for participation in medical assistance, the department may modify or change its rules as necessary to qualify for participation; providing, the provisions of this section do not apply to department rules governing abortion.

(4)  The department shall comply with all pertinent requirements of the Social Security Act and all orders, rules, and regulations adopted thereunder when required as a condition of participation in benefits under the Social Security Act.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

